Connecticut, session 2026, HB05298.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) For the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2028, and each fiscal year thereafter, the Department of
Veterans Affairs shall administer a program to provide grants to
municipalities and nonprofit providers of human or social services for
capital expenditure projects to place or maintain war or veterans'
memorials or monuments.
(b) Not later than January 1, 2027, the department shall develop
eligibility criteria to be used in selecting among applicants for such
grants, develop application forms and deadlines and post in a
conspicuous location on the department's Internet web site a description
of the grant program that includes, but is not limited to, such criteria,
forms and deadlines.
(c) (1) For the purposes described in subdivision (2) of this subsection,
the State Bond Commission shall have the power from time to time to
authorize the issuance of bonds of the state in one or more series and in
principal amounts not exceeding in the aggregate two million dollars.
LCO 1 of 3

Substitute Bill No. 5298
(2) The proceeds of the sale of such bonds, to the extent of the amount
stated in subdivision (1) of this subsection, shall be used by the
Department of Veterans Affairs for the purpose of providing grants to
municipalities and nonprofit providers of human or social services for
capital expenditure projects under subsection (a) of this section.
(3) All provisions of section 3-20 of the general statutes, or the exercise
of any right or power granted thereby, that are not inconsistent with the
provisions of this section are hereby adopted and shall apply to all
bonds authorized by the State Bond Commission pursuant to this
section. Temporary notes in anticipation of the money to be derived
from the sale of any such bonds so authorized may be issued in
accordance with section 3-20 of the general statutes and from time to
time renewed. Such bonds shall mature at such time or times not
exceeding twenty years from their respective dates as may be provided
in or pursuant to the resolution or resolutions of the State Bond
Commission authorizing such bonds. None of such bonds shall be
authorized except upon a finding by the State Bond Commission that
there has been filed with it a request for such authorization that is signed
by or on behalf of the Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management
and states such terms and conditions as said commission, in its
discretion, may require. Such bonds issued pursuant to this section shall
be general obligations of the state and the full faith and credit of the state
of Connecticut are pledged for the payment of the principal of and
interest on such bonds as the same become due, and accordingly and as
part of the contract of the state with the holders of such bonds,
appropriation of all amounts necessary for punctual payment of such
principal and interest is hereby made, and the State Treasurer shall pay
such principal and interest as the same become due.
(d) Not later than January 1, 2028, and annually thereafter, the
department shall submit a report, in accordance with the provisions of
section 11-4a of the general statutes, to the joint standing committee of
the General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to veterans'
and military affairs. Such report shall include information for the
preceding calendar year on the number of applications for grants that
LCO 2 of 3

Substitute Bill No. 5298
were received, the number of grants that were awarded and a list of the
municipalities and nonprofit providers of human or social services that
received grants.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 New section
VA Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 3 of 3